Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Performance.

Sec. 45.02.501.
Insurable interest in goods; manner of identification of goods.

The buyer obtains a special property and an insurable interest in goods by identification of existing goods as goods to which the contract refers even though the goods so identified are nonconforming and the buyer has an option to return or reject them. Identification can be made at any time and in any manner explicitly agreed to by the parties. In the absence of explicit agreement, identification occurs

when the contract is made if it is for the sale of goods already existing and identified;

if the contract is for the sale of future goods other than those described in (3) of this subsection, when goods are shipped, marked, or otherwise designated by the seller as goods to which the contract refers;

when the crops are planted or otherwise become growing crops or the young are conceived if the contract is for the sale of unborn young to be born within 12 months after contracting or for the sale of crops to be harvested within 12 months or the next normal harvest season after contracting, whichever is longer.

The seller retains an insurable interest in the goods as long as title to or a security interest in the goods remains in the seller and, if the identification is by the seller alone, the seller may, until default or insolvency or notification to the buyer that the identification is final, substitute other goods for those identified.

Nothing in this section impairs an insurable interest recognized under another statute or rule of law.

History.

(§ 2.501 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.502.
Buyer’s right to goods on seller’s repudiation, failure to deliver, or insolvency.

Subject to (b) and (c) of this section and even though the goods have not been shipped, a buyer who has paid a part or all of the price of goods in which the buyer has a special property under the provisions of AS

45.02.501

may, on making and keeping good a tender of an unpaid portion of their price, recover them from the seller if

in the case of goods bought for personal, family, or household purposes, the seller repudiates or fails to deliver as required by the contract; or

in all cases, the seller becomes insolvent within 10 days after receipt of the first installment on their price.

The buyer’s right to recover the goods under (a)(1) of this section vests upon acquisition of a special property even if the seller had not then repudiated or failed to deliver.

If the identification creating the buyer’s special property has been made by the buyer, the buyer acquires the right to recover the goods only if they conform to the contract for sale.

History.

(§ 2.502 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 10 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Collateral references. —

67A Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 1053.

Sec. 45.02.503.
Manner of seller’s tender of delivery.

Tender of delivery requires that the seller put and hold conforming goods at the buyer’s disposition and give the buyer any notification reasonably necessary to enable the buyer to take delivery. The manner, time, and place for tender are determined by the agreement and this chapter, and, in particular,

tender must be at a reasonable hour and, if it is of goods, they must be kept available for the period reasonably necessary to enable the buyer to take possession; but

unless otherwise agreed, the buyer must furnish facilities reasonably suited to the receipt of the goods.

If the case is within AS

45.02.504

respecting shipment, tender requires that the seller comply with its provisions.

If the seller is required to deliver at a particular destination, tender requires that the seller comply with (a) of this section and also in an appropriate case tender documents as described in (d) and (e) of this section.

If goods are in the possession of a bailee and are to be delivered without being moved,

tender requires that the seller either tender a negotiable document of title covering the goods or procure acknowledgment by the bailee of the buyer’s right to possession of the goods; but

tender to the buyer of a nonnegotiable document of title or of a record directing the bailee to deliver is sufficient tender unless the buyer seasonably objects, and, except as otherwise provided in AS 45.29, receipt by the bailee of notification of the buyer’s rights fixes those rights as against the bailee and all third persons; but risk of loss of the goods and of a failure by the bailee to honor the nonnegotiable document of title or to obey the direction remains on the seller until the buyer has had a reasonable time to present the document or direction, and a refusal by the bailee to honor the document or to obey the direction defeats the tender.

If the contract requires the seller to deliver documents,

the seller must tender all such documents in correct form except as provided in AS

45.02.323(b)

with respect to bills of lading in a set; and

tender through customary banking channels is sufficient, and dishonor of a draft accompanying or associated with the documents constitutes nonacceptance or rejection.

History.

(§ 2.503 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 18, 19 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (d)(2), substituted “record directing” for “written direction to” following “document of title or of a”, and substituted “, except as otherwise provided in AS 45.29” following “buyer seasonably objects, and”; in (e)(2), added “or associated with” following “a draft accompanying”.

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 489 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.504.
Shipment by seller.

If the seller is required or authorized to send the goods to the buyer and the contract does not require the seller to deliver them at a particular destination, then, unless otherwise agreed, the seller must

put the goods in the possession of such a carrier and make such a contract for their transportation as is reasonable, having regard to the nature of the goods and other circumstances of the case;

obtain and promptly deliver or tender in due form any document necessary to enable the buyer to obtain possession of the goods or otherwise required by the agreement or by usage of trade; and

promptly notify the buyer of the shipment.

Failure to notify the buyer under (a)(3) of this section or to make a proper contract under (a)(1) of this section is a ground for rejection only if material delay or loss ensues.

History.

(§ 2.504 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.505.
Seller’s shipment under reservation.

If the seller has identified goods to the contract by or before shipment,

the seller’s procurement of a negotiable bill of lading to the seller’s order or otherwise reserves in the seller a security interest in the goods; the seller’s procurement of the bill to the order of a financing agency or of the buyer indicates in addition only the seller’s expectation of transferring that interest to the person named;

a nonnegotiable bill of lading to the seller or the nominee of the seller reserves possession of the goods as security, but, except in a case of conditional delivery (AS

45.02.507(b)

), a nonnegotiable bill of lading naming the buyer as consignee reserves no security interest even though the seller retains possession or control of the bill of lading.

If shipment by the seller with reservation of a security interest is in violation of the contract for sale, it constitutes an improper contract for transportation within AS

45.02.504

but impairs neither the rights given to the buyer by shipment and identification of the goods to the contract nor the seller’s powers as a holder of a negotiable document of title.

History.

(§ 2.505 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 20 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (a)(2), added “or control” preceding “of the bill of lading”; in (b), substituted “AS

45.02.504

” for “the preceding section” and added “of title” at the end of the subsection; made a stylistic change.

Sec. 45.02.506.
Rights of financing agency.

A financing agency by paying or purchasing for value a draft that relates to a shipment of goods acquires to the extent of the payment or purchase and in addition to its own rights under the draft and a document of title securing it any rights of the shipper in the goods including the right to stop delivery and the shipper’s right to have the draft honored by the buyer.

The right to reimbursement of a financing agency that has in good faith honored or purchased the draft under commitment to or authority from the buyer is not impaired by subsequent discovery of defects with reference to a relevant document that was apparently regular.

History.

(§ 2.506 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 21 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), deleted “on its face” following “that was apparently regular”.

Sec. 45.02.507.
Effect of seller’s tender; delivery on condition.

Tender of delivery is a condition to the buyer’s duty to accept the goods and, unless otherwise agreed, to the buyer’s duty to pay for them. Tender entitles the seller to acceptance of the goods and to payment according to the contract.

If payment is due and demanded on the delivery to the buyer of goods or documents of title, the buyer’s right as against the seller to retain or dispose of them is conditional upon the buyer’s making the payment due.

History.

(§ 2.507 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.508.
Cure by seller of improper tender or delivery; replacement.

If a tender or delivery by the seller is rejected because nonconforming and the time for performance has not yet expired, the seller may seasonably notify the buyer of the intent of the seller to cure and may then, within the contract time, make a conforming delivery.

If the buyer rejects a nonconforming tender that the seller had reasonable grounds to believe would be acceptable with or without money allowance, the seller may, if the seller seasonably notified the buyer, have a further reasonable time to substitute a conforming tender.

History.

(§ 2.508 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.509.
Risk of loss in the absence of breach.

Where the contract requires or authorizes the seller to ship the goods by carrier,

if it does not require the seller to deliver them at a particular destination, the risk of loss passes to the buyer when the goods are duly delivered to the carrier even though the shipment is under reservation (AS

45.02.505

); but

if it does require the seller to deliver them at a particular destination and the goods are there duly tendered while in the possession of the carrier, the risk of loss passes to the buyer when the goods are there duly so tendered as to enable the buyer to take delivery.

Where the goods are held by a bailee to be delivered without being moved, the risk of loss passes to the buyer

on the buyer’s receipt of possession or control of a negotiable document of title covering the goods;

on acknowledgment by the bailee of the buyer’s right to possession of the goods; or

after the buyer’s receipt of possession or control of a nonnegotiable document of title or other direction to deliver in a record, as provided in AS

45.02.503(d)(2)

.

In any case not within (a) or (b) of this section, the risk of loss passes to the buyer on the buyer’s receipt of the goods if the seller is a merchant; otherwise the risk passes to the buyer on tender of delivery.

This section is subject to contrary agreement of the parties and to the provisions on sale on approval (AS

45.02.327

), and on effect of breach on risk of loss (AS

45.02.510

).

History.

(§ 2.509 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 22 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b)(1), added “possession or control of” preceding “a negotiable document”; in (b)(3), added “possession or control of” preceding “a nonnegotiable document”, deleted “written” preceding “direction to deliver”, added “in a record,” preceding “as provided in AS

45.02.503(d)(2)

”.

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, §§ 383 to 390.

Who bears risk of loss of goods under UCC §§ 2-509, 2-510, 66 ALR3d 145.

Sec. 45.02.510.
Effect of breach on risk of loss.

If a tender or delivery of goods so fails to conform to the contract as to give a right of rejection, the risk of their loss remains on the seller until cure or acceptance.

If the buyer rightfully revokes acceptance, the buyer may, to the extent of a deficiency in the buyer’s effective insurance coverage, treat the risk of loss as having rested on the seller from the beginning.

If the buyer as to conforming goods already identified to the contract for sale repudiates or is otherwise in breach before risk of their loss has passed to the buyer, the seller may, to the extent of a deficiency in the seller’s effective insurance coverage, treat the risk of loss as resting on the buyer for a commercially reasonable time.

History.

(§ 2.510 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

Who bears risk of loss of goods under UCC §§ 2-509, 2-510, 66 ALR3d 145.

Sec. 45.02.511.
Tender of payment by buyer; payment by check.

Unless otherwise agreed, tender of payment is a condition to the seller’s duty to tender and complete a delivery.

Tender of payment is sufficient when made by a means or in a manner current in the ordinary course of business unless the seller demands payment in legal tender and gives an extension of time reasonably necessary to procure it.

Subject to the provisions of the code on the effect of an instrument on an obligation (AS

45.03.310

), payment by check is conditional and is defeated as between the parties by dishonor of the check on due presentment.

History.

(§ 2.511 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 10 ch 34 SLA 1993; am § 13 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 607

67A Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 922.

Sec. 45.02.512.
Payment by buyer before inspection.

If the contract requires payment before inspection, nonconformity of the goods does not excuse the buyer from so making payment unless

the nonconformity appears without inspection; or

despite tender of the required documents, the circumstances would justify injunction against honor under AS

45.05.109(b)

.

Payment under (a) of this section does not constitute an acceptance of goods or impair the buyer’s right to inspect or any of the buyer’s remedies.

History.

(§ 2.512 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For transition provisions relating to the applicability of the 1999 amendment of subsection (a), see § 26, ch. 75, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 45.02.513.
Buyer’s right to inspection of goods.

Unless otherwise agreed and subject to (c) of this section, if goods are tendered, delivered or identified to the contract for sale, the buyer may before payment or acceptance inspect them at a reasonable place and time and in a reasonable manner. If the seller is required or authorized to send the goods to the buyer, the inspection may be after their arrival.

Expenses of inspection must be borne by the buyer but may be recovered from the seller if the goods do not conform and are rejected.

Unless otherwise agreed and subject to the provisions on C.I.F. contracts (AS

45.02.321

), the buyer is not entitled to inspect the goods before payment of the price if the contract provides

for delivery “C.O.D.” or on other like terms; or

for payment against documents of title, except where the payment is due only after the goods are to become available for inspection.

A place or method of inspection fixed by the parties is presumed to be exclusive but, unless otherwise expressly agreed, it does not postpone identification or shift the place for delivery or for passing the risk of loss. If compliance becomes impossible, inspection is as provided in this section unless the place or method fixed was clearly intended as an indispensable condition, failure of which avoids the contract.

History.

(§ 2.513 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 560 et seq.

Time, place and manner of buyer’s inspection of goods under UCC § 2-513, 36 ALR4th 726.

Sec. 45.02.514.
When documents deliverable on acceptance; when on payment.

Unless otherwise agreed, documents against which a draft is drawn are to be delivered to the drawee on acceptance of the draft if it is payable more than three days after presentment; otherwise, only on payment.

History.

(§ 2.514 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.515.
Preserving evidence of goods in dispute.

In furtherance of the adjustment of a claim or dispute,

either party, on reasonable notification to the other and to ascertain the facts and preserve evidence, may inspect, test, and sample the goods, including the goods in the possession or control of the other; and

the parties may agree to a third party inspection or survey to determine the conformity or condition of the goods and may agree that the findings shall be binding upon them in a subsequent litigation or adjustment.

History.

(§ 2.515 ch 114 SLA 1962)